Maine, session 132, LD2079.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 5 MRSA §3241, sub-§5, as enacted by PL 2025, c. 495, §2, is amended to
read:
5. Municipal housing data reporting. By January March 31st of each year, a
municipality with 4,000 or more residents shall provide to the office for use in
administering the program an annual a report of that includes the following information
from the prior calendar year:
A. Residential The number of residential units approved through residential building
permit applications, including the number of applications submitted, approved and
denied, categorized into single-family, single-family with the following residential
building types: accessory dwelling unit, 2-to-4-family and more-than-4-family homes
single-family housing unit, 2-unit housing, 3-to-4-unit housing and housing with 5 or
more units. The number of units that are income-restricted must also be reported if
known;
B. The number of dwelling units permitted and demolished approved for demolition;
and
C. The number of residential units approved through certificates of occupancy or other
final approvals of housing units issued, the number of those housing units affordable
to persons or families whose incomes are 80% or less of the area median income as
determined by the Maine State Housing Authority and the number of those housing
units affordable to persons or families whose incomes are from 81% to 120% of the
area median income as determined by the Maine State Housing Authority categorized
into the following residential building types: accessory dwelling unit, single-family
housing unit, 2-unit housing, 3-to-4-unit housing and housing with 5 or more units.
As used in this subsection, "accessory dwelling unit" has the same meaning as in Title
30‑A, section 4301, subsection 1‑C.
Page 1 - 132LR2639(03)

The office shall encourage municipalities with fewer than 4,000 residents to report the
information required by this subsection.
Page 2 - 132LR2639(03)